Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Credit or Debit Card Crimes

434.550.
Citation of KRS 434.550 to 434.730.

KRS

434.550

to

434.730

may be cited as the Credit and Debit Card Crime Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 1; 1978, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

434.560.
Definitions for KRS 434.550 to 434.730.

As used in KRS

434.550

to

434.730

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Automated banking device” means any machine which when properly activated by a credit card, debit card or personal identification code will perform any of the following services:

Dispense money as a debit to the cardholder’s savings or checking account; or

Print the cardholder’s savings or checking account balances on a statement; or

Transfer funds between a cardholder’s savings and checking account; or

Accept payments on a cardholder’s loan; or

Dispense cash advances on an open end credit or a revolving charge agreement; or

Accept deposits to a customer’s savings or checking account; or

Receive inquiries of verification of checks and dispense information which verifies that funds are available to cover said checks; or

Cause money to be transferred electronically from a cardholder’s account to an account held by any business, firm, retail merchant, corporation, or any other organization;

“Cardholder” means the person or organization named on the face of a credit or debit card to whom or for whose benefit the credit or debit card is issued by an issuer;

“Credit card” means any instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate, credit number or by any other name, issued by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services or anything else of value on credit;

“Debit card” means any instrument or device, known by any name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services and anything else of value, payment of which is made against funds previously deposited by cardholder;

“E.F.T. system” means an electronic funds transfer system whereby funds are transferred electronically from a cardholder’s account to any other account;

“Expired credit card” means a credit card which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has expired;

“Expired debit card” means a debit card which is no longer valid because the term shown on it has expired;

“Issuer” means the business organization or financial institution which issues a credit or debit card or its duly authorized agent;

“Merchant” means an owner or operator of any retail mercantile establishment or any agent, employee, lessee, consignee, officer, director, franchisee, or independent contractor of such owner or operator. “Merchant” also means a person who receives from an authorized user of a payment card, or someone the person believes to be an authorized user, a payment card or information from a payment card, or what the person believes to be a payment card or information from a payment card, as the instrument for obtaining, purchasing, or receiving goods, services, money, or anything else of value from the person;

“Participating party” means a business organization or financial institution, or any duly authorized agent of such business organization or financial institution, which is obligated by contract to acquire from a person, business organization or financial institution providing money, goods, services or anything else of value, a sales slip, sales draft or other instrument evidencing a credit or debit card transaction and from whom the issuer is obligated by contract to acquire or participate in such sales slip, sales draft or other instrument;

“Payment card” means a credit card, charge card, debit card, or any other card that is issued to an authorized card user and that allows the user to obtain, purchase, or receive goods, services, money, or anything else of value from a merchant;

“Presentation or presents” as used herein shall be construed to define those actions taken by a cardholder or any person to introduce a credit or debit card into an automated banking device or merely displaying or showing a credit or debit card to the issuer, a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other entity with intent to defraud;

“Receives” or “receiving” means acquiring possession or control of a credit or debit card;

“Reencoder” means an electronic device that places encoded information from the magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card onto the magnetic strip or stripe of a different payment card;

“Revoked credit card” means a credit card which is no longer valid because permission to use it has been suspended or terminated by the issuer;

“Revoked debit card” means a debit card which is no longer valid because permission to use it has been suspended or terminated by the issuer; and

“Scanning device” means a scanner, reader, or any other electronic device that is used to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 2; 1978, ch. 67, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2004, ch. 27, § 2, effective July 13, 2004.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Weinberg, Commercial Law and Consumer Credit, 65 Ky. L.J. 370 (1976-77).

434.570.
False statement as to identity or financial condition.

In addition and supplemental to the acts proscribed under KRS

517.090

, a person who makes or causes to be made, either directly or indirectly, any false statement in writing, knowing it to be false and with intent that it be relied on, respecting his identity or that of any other person, firm, or corporation, or as to a material fact about his financial condition or that of any other person, firm, or corporation, for the purpose of procuring the issuance of a credit or debit card, is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 3; 1974, ch. 406, § 325; 1978, ch. 67, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 51, effective July 14, 1992.

434.580.
Theft — Receipt of stolen credit or debit card — Presumption.

A person who takes a credit or debit card from the person, possession, custody or control of another without the consent of the cardholder or of the issuer or who, with knowledge that it has been so taken, receives the credit or debit card with intent to use it or to sell it or to transfer it to a person other than the issuer or the cardholder is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of KRS

434.730

. Taking a credit or debit card without consent includes obtaining it by conduct defined or known as statutory larceny, common-law larceny by trespassory taking, common-law larceny by trick, embezzlement, or obtaining property by false pretenses, false promise or extortion.

A person who has in his possession or under his control two (2) or more credit or debit cards which have been taken or obtained in violation of subsection (1) of this section is presumed to know that the credit or debit cards have been so taken or obtained.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 4; 1978, ch. 67, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The conflicting penalties for receiving stolen credit cards should be resolved in favor of the lesser penalty found in this section because, in situations where conflicts arise in the construction of a penal statute, they will be resolved in favor of leniency.

OAG 76-141

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Receiving stolen property, KRS

514.110

.

Theft by unlawful taking or disposition, KRS

514.030

.

434.590.
Receipt of credit or debit card lost, mislaid, or delivered by mistake, with intent to use or transfer.

A person who receives a credit or debit card that he knows to have been lost, mislaid, or delivered under a mistake as to the identity or address of the cardholder, and who retains possession with intent to use it or to sell it or to transfer it to a person other than the issuer or the cardholder is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of KRS

434.730

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 5; 1978, ch. 67, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Theft of property lost, mislaid, or delivered by mistake, KRS

514.050

.

434.600.
Sale by or purchase from person other than issuer.

A person other than the issuer who sells a credit or debit card or a person who buys a credit or debit card from a person other than the issuer is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 6; 1978, ch. 67, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 52, effective July 14, 1992.

434.610.
Control over card as security for debt.

A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a participating party, a person or organization providing money, goods, services or anything else of value, or any other person, obtains control over a credit or debit card as security for debt is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of KRS

434.730

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 7; 1978, ch. 67, § 7, effective June 17, 1978.

434.620.
Receipt of card in violation of KRS 434.570 to 434.610.

A person, other than the issuer, who receives a credit or debit card which he knows was obtained, taken, or retained under circumstances which constitute a violation of KRS

434.570

to

434.610

is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 8; 1978, ch. 67, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 53, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The conflicting penalties for receiving stolen credit cards should be resolved in favor of the lesser penalty found in KRS

434.580

rather than the penalty found in this section because, in situations where conflicts arise in the construction of a penal statute, they will be resolved in favor of leniency.

OAG 76-141

.

434.630.
False making or embossing of credit or debit card — Possession of two or more falsely made or embossed cards — Definitions.

A person who, with intent to defraud a purported issuer, a participating party, a person or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other person, falsely makes or falsely embosses a purported credit or debit card, or utters such a credit or debit card or possesses such a credit or debit card with knowledge that such credit or debit card has been falsely made or falsely embossed is guilty of a Class D felony.

A person other than the purported issuer who possesses two (2) or more credit or debit cards which are falsely made or falsely embossed is presumed to possess the same with knowledge that they have been falsely embossed or falsely made and with the intent to defraud.

A person “falsely makes” a credit or debit card when he makes or draws, in whole or in part, a device or instrument which purports to be the credit or debit card of a named issuer but which is not such a credit or debit card because the issuer did not authorize the making or drawing, or alters a credit or debit card which was validly issued. A person “falsely embosses” a credit or debit card when, without the authorization of the named issuer, he completes a credit or debit card by adding any of the matter, other than the signature of the cardholder, which an issuer requires to appear on the credit or debit card before it can be used by a cardholder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 9; 1978, ch. 67, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 54, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Criminal possession of forged instrument in the second degree, KRS

516.060

.

Forgery in the second degree, KRS

516.030

.

434.640.
Unauthorized signature.

A person other than the cardholder or a person authorized by him who, with intent to defraud the issuer, or a participating party, or a person or organization providing money, goods, services or anything else of value, or any other person, signs a credit or debit card is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of KRS

434.730

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 10; 1978, ch. 67, § 10, effective June 17, 1978.

434.650.
Fraudulent use — Presumption as to knowledge of revocation.

A person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a participating party, a person, or organization providing money, goods, services, or anything else of value, or any other person:

Uses for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value a credit or debit card obtained or retained in violation of KRS

434.570

to

434.650

, or any of such sections, or a credit or debit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked;

Obtains money, goods, services, or anything else of value by representing without consent of the cardholder that he or she is the holder of a specified card or by representing that he or she is the holder of a card and suchcard has not in fact been issued;

Uses a credit or debit card obtained or retained in violation of KRS

434.570

to

434.650

, or any of such sections, or a credit or debit card which he or she knows is forged, expired, or revoked, as authority or identification to cash or attempts to cash or otherwise negotiate or transfer a check or other order for payment of money, whether or not negotiable, if said negotiation or transfer or attempt to negotiate or transfer would constitute a crime under KRS

514.040

or

516.030

; or

Deposits into his or her account or any account, via an automated banking device, a false, fictitious, forged, altered, or counterfeit check, draft, money order, or any other such document not his or her lawful or legal property;

is guilty as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.

The penalty for violating paragraph (a) of this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;

The person has three (3) or more convictions under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered; or

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value obtained in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony.

A person who receives money, goods, services, or anything else of value as a result of a false, fictitious, forged, altered, or counterfeit check, draft, money order, or any other such document having been deposited into an account via an automated banking device, knowing at the time of receipt of the money, goods, services, or item of value that the document so deposited was false, fictitious, forged, altered, or counterfeit or that the above described deposited item was not his lawful or legal property, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Knowledge of revocation shall be presumed to have been received by a cardholder four (4) days after it has been mailed to him or her at the address set forth on the credit or debit card or at his or her last known address by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and, if the address is more than five hundred (500) miles from the place of mailing, by air mail. If the address is located outside the United States, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, the Canal Zone, and Canada, notice shall be presumed to have been received ten (10) days after mailing by registered or certified mail.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 11; 1974, ch. 406, § 326; 1978, ch. 67, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 55, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 106, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 66, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

434.655.
Fraudulent use of credit or debit card after reporting it lost, as stolen, or not received.

A cardholder who fraudulently uses a credit or debit card to obtain money, goods, services, or anything else of value after said cardholder has reported to the issuer said credit or debit card lost, as stolen, or not received is deemed to have used said credit or debit card in order to defraud the issuer; and said cardholder shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;

The person has three (3) or more convictions under paragraph (a) of this subsection within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered; or

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony.

A cardholder who, after using a credit or debit card, fraudulently reports to the issuer that such usage or transaction was not made by said cardholder, or that said credit or debit card was lost, stolen, or not received at the time of such usage or transaction, in order to defraud the issuer, the cardholder, or any other person in connection with said usage, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;

The person has three (3) or more convictions under paragraph (a) of this subsection within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered; or

The value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 67, § 17, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 377, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2009, ch. 106, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 66, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

434.660.
Fraud by authorized persons, business organization, or financial institution.

A person, business organization, or financial institution who is authorized by an issuer to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit or debit card by a cardholder, or any agent or employee of such person, business organization, or financial institution, who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a participating party, the cardholder, or any other person, furnishes money, goods, or services or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit or debit card obtained or retained in violation of KRS

434.570

to

434.650

, or any of such sections, or a credit or debit card which he knows is forged, expired, or revoked is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, if the value of all money, goods, services, or other things of value furnished in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is less than five hundred dollars ($500), a Class D felony if such value is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or a Class C felony if such value is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 12; 1978, ch. 67, § 15, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 56, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 106, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

434.670.
Failure to furnish goods, services, etc., represented in writing as furnished.

A person, business organization, or financial institution who is authorized by an issuer to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation of a credit or debit card by a cardholder, or any agent or employee of such person, business organization, or financial institution, who, with intent to defraud the issuer, a participating party, the cardholder, or any other person, fails to furnish money, goods, services, or anything else of value which he represents in writing to the issuer that he has furnished over a six (6) month period is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the difference between the value of all money, goods, services, or anything else of value actually furnished and the value represented to the issuer to have been furnished is less than five hundred dollars ($500), a Class D felony if such value is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or a Class C felony if such value is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 13; 1978, ch. 67, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 57, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 106, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

434.675.
Use of scanning device or reencoder to obtain payment card information prohibited.

No person shall use a scanning device to access, read, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card with the intent to defraud the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s payment card, or a merchant.

No person shall use a reencoder to place information encoded on the magnetic strip or stripe of a payment card onto the magnetic strip or stripe of a different card with the intent to defraud the authorized user, the issuer of the authorized user’s payment card, or a merchant.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

434.680.
Unauthorized production or reproduction of credit or debit card — Definition — Presumption as to possession of incomplete card.

A person other than the cardholder possessing an incomplete credit or debit card, or possessing a purported distinctive element of a credit or debit card, with intent to complete such incomplete credit or debit card or to utilize such purported distinctive element in the production or reproduction of any credit or debit card without the consent of the issuer, or a person possessing, with knowledge of its character, a distinctive element of any credit or debit card or any machinery, plates, or any contrivance designed to produce or reproduce instruments purporting to be the credit or debit cards, or a distinctive element of the credit or debit cards, of an issuer or of any issuer in a group of issuers utilizing a common distinctive element or elements in credit or debit cards issued by all members of such group, who has not consented to the production or reproduction of such card, is guilty of a Class D felony. A credit or debit card is “incomplete” if part of the matter other than the signature of the cardholder, which an issuer or any issuer in a group of issuers utilizing a common distinctive element or elements in credit or debit cards issued by all members of such group, requires to appear on the credit or debit card before it can be used by the cardholder has not yet been stamped, embossed, imprinted, or written on it. A “distinctive element” of a credit or debit card is any material or component used in the fabrication of credit or debit cards which, by virtue of such element’s chemical or physical composition, color, or design, is unique to the credit or debit cards issued by a particular issuer or group of issuers utilizing a common distinctive element or elements in credit or debit cards issued by all members of such group.

A person other than the cardholder or issuer who possesses two (2) or more incomplete credit or debit cards is presumed to possess the same without the consent of the issuer and with the intent to complete them.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 14; 1978, ch. 67, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 58, effective July 14, 1992.

434.685.
Misuse of electronic information prohibited.

Any person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, the cardholder, or any other person or organization, (a) intercepts, taps or alters electronic information between an automated banking device and the issuer, or (b) originates electronic information to an automated banking device or to the issuer, via any line, wire, or any other means of electronic transmission, at any junction or terminal, or at any location within an E.F.T. system, for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services or anything else of value, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (2) of KRS

434.730

.

Any person who, with intent to defraud the issuer, cardholder, or any other person or organization, intercepts, taps or alters electronic information between an automated banking device and the issuer, or originates electronic information to an automated banking device or to the issuer, via any line, wire, or other means of electronic transmission, at any junction or terminal, or at any location within the E.F.T. system, and therefore causes funds to be transferred from one account to any other account, violates this subsection and is subject to the penalties set forth in subsection (2) of KRS

434.730

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 67, § 13, effective June 17, 1978.

434.690.
Receiving goods, services, etc., obtained by fraud — Presumption as to possession of transportation tickets fraudulently obtained.

A person who receives money, goods, services, or anything else of value obtained in violation of KRS

434.650

, knowing or believing that it was so obtained is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor unless:

The value of all money, goods, services, and other things of value received in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;

The value of all money, goods, services, and other things of value received in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but is less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;

The person has three (3) or more convictions under paragraph (a) of this subsection within the last five (5) years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered; or

The value of all money, goods, services, and other things of value received in violation of this section over a six (6) month period is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony.

A person who possesses three (3) or more tickets for airline, railroad, steamship, or other transportation service, which tickets were obtained by the use of a stolen or forged credit or debit card is presumed to know that such tickets were so obtained.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 15; 1978, ch. 67, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 463, § 59, effective July 14, 1992; 2009, ch. 106, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2021 ch. 66, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

434.695.
Use of false, fictitious, unauthorized or counterfeit card prima facie evidence of knowledge.

The presentation or use of a false, fictitious, unauthorized or counterfeit, credit or debit card, or other credit or debit device for the purpose of obtaining money, goods, services or anything else of value shall be prima facie evidence of knowledge that the said credit or debit device is false, fictitious, counterfeit, or its use is unauthorized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 67, § 18, effective June 17, 1978.

434.697.
Phishing.

For purposes of this section:

“Electronic mail message” means a message sent to a unique destination that consists of a unique user name or mailbox and a reference to an Internet domain, whether or not displayed, to which the message can be sent or delivered; and

“Identifying information” means specific details that can be used to access a person’s financial accounts or to obtain goods or services, including but not limited to the person’s Social Security number, driver’s license number, bank account number, credit or debit card number, personal identification number, automated or electronic signature, unique biometric data, or account password.

A person is guilty of phishing if he or she knowingly or intentionally solicits, requests, or takes any action to induce another person to provide identifying information by means of a Web page, electronic mail message, or otherwise using the Internet, by representing himself or herself either directly or by implication, to be a third person without the authority or approval of such other person.

In any prosecution for a violation of this section, the Commonwealth is not required to establish, and it is no defense that:

A person other than the defendant who violated this section has not been convicted, apprehended, or identified; or

Some of the acts constituting a violation of this section did not occur in Kentucky or were not a criminal offense or elements of a criminal offense where they did occur.

Phishing is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 100, § 12, effective June 25, 2009.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note: Fraud, Fools, and Phishing: Mail Fraud and the Person of Ordinary Prudence in the Internet Age,
99 Ky. L.J. 379 (2010/2011).

434.700.
Prosecutions.

In any prosecution for violation of KRS

434.550

to

434.730

, the Commonwealth is not required to establish and it is no defense that:

A person other than the defendant who violated KRS

434.550

to

434.730

has not been convicted, apprehended, or identified; or

Some of the acts constituting the crime did not occur in Kentucky or were not a crime or elements of a crime where they did occur.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 16.

434.710.
Sufficiency of evidence as to presumptions.

When KRS

434.550

to

434.730

establishes a presumption with respect to any fact which is an element of a crime, it has the following consequences:

When there is sufficient evidence of the facts which give rise to the presumption to go to the jury, the issue of the existence of the presumed facts must be submitted to the jury, unless the court is satisfied that the evidence as a whole clearly negatives the presumed facts; and

When the issue of the existence of the presumed fact is submitted to the jury, the court shall charge that while the presumed fact, must, on all the evidence, be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, the law declares that the jury may regard the facts giving rise to the presumption as sufficient evidence of the presumed fact.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 17.

434.715.
Criminal or civil liability prohibited for false arrest or false imprisonment where prima facie evidence of fraud exists and proper notice is given.

In the event of the existence of prima facie evidence of fraudulent intent as defined in KRS

434.695

and proper notice given as required, any person, firm or corporation causing the arrest of a person so using a credit or debit card shall not be criminally or civilly liable for false arrest or false imprisonment.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 67, § 19, effective June 17, 1978.

434.720.
Construction of KRS 434.550 to 434.730.

KRS

434.550

to

434.730

shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of the criminal law of this Commonwealth which presently applies or may in the future apply to any transaction which violates KRS

434.550

to

434.730

, unless such provision is inconsistent with the terms of KRS 434.550 to 434.730.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 19.

434.730.
Penalties.

A person who has violated KRS

434.590

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

A person who has violated KRS

434.600

shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

A person who has violated the provisions of KRS 434.675(1) shall be guilty of a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.

A person who has violated the provisions of KRS 434.675(2) shall be guilty of a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for each subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 83, § 18; 1986, ch. 331, § 53, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 463, § 60, effective July 14, 1992; 2004, ch. 27, § 3, effective July 13, 2004.